District of Columbia statutes.
2-1553

Grant making authority.

(a)

Subject to the requirements in subsections (a-1) and (a-2) of this section, the Mayor is authorized to make grants to a single non-service provider, nonprofit organization of which at least 90% shall be used to make sub-grants for the purpose of providing services to District children, youth and their families, including, but not limited to, early childhood development opportunities, safe and enriching centers of learning in and out of school, and other training, recreational and educational services.

(a-1)

(1)

Sub-grants shall be awarded on a 3-year basis, subject to the availability of funding.

(2)

At least 50% of the members of a review panel for sub-grant applications shall be individuals who are not employees or contractors of the Children Youth Investment Trust Corporation.

(3)

All sub-grants of District funds shall be awarded on a competitive basis, except in the case of an emergency circumstance, as determined by a vote of the Board of Directors.

(4)

For Fiscal Year 2016, $660,448 of available funds for sub-grants shall be awarded to the following types of programs to serve children and youth in areas of the city possessing the highest rates of poverty:

(A)

Out-of-school time programs for underserved children and youth that include free after school and summer day camps provided at public schools, community centers, and community rooms in public housing;

(B)

Programs through which students, faculty, and staff engage in the District through activism, advocacy, service, volunteer projects, and community-based learning and research opportunities;

(C)

Programs to educate youth on how to plan and prepare healthy meals;

(D)

After school and summer academic programs for 5th through 8th graders in at-risk communities that are designed to combine demanding academic work with mentoring, skill-building, and individual student achievement plans;

(E)

Programs to enrich the quality of life, foster intellectual stimulation, and promote cross-cultural understanding and appreciation of local history in all neighborhoods of the District;

(F)

Programs that use artistic expression to develop character and leadership, and help to prepare at-risk African American boys and young men to have a positive impact on their communities;

(G)

Programs that provide an extended day program for kindergartners through 5th graders and provide after school academic enrichment that supports the daytime instruction through alternative learning methods and activities and homework assistance;

(H)

Programs that provide low-income children individualized reading instruction in order to improve their literacy;

(I)

Rehabilitation programs that serve female youth ages 9 through 17 years involved in the juvenile justice system and provide individual and group counseling, therapeutic recreation, job training, mentoring, and community service opportunities;

(J)

Programs that offer anger management, conflict resolution, teamwork, good sportsmanship, and other life skills while helping youth stay occupied in productive activities, such as basketball or other sports;

(K)

Programs that develop and foster the creative talents of youth through performing and visual arts while teaching them discipline, commitment, and team motivation; and

(L)

Programs that offer music instruction and performance, tutoring, life skills, summer arts, and culture to youth from ages of 9 through 18 years of age.

(a-2)

No grant may be awarded under this section in excess of $1 million during a 12-month period, either singularly or cumulatively, unless the grant is submitted to the Council for approval, in accordance with § 1-204.51, or by act.

(a-3)

To be eligible to receive a grant pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the non-service provider, nonprofit organization shall meet the following requirements:

(1)

All positions on the Board of Directors are filled, including any position for nonvoting government officials, unless a vacancy has occurred on the board because a board member’s term expired or terminated for any reason; provided, that the position is filled within 90 days of the vacancy.

(2)

Each board member serving has demonstrated knowledge and experience in the disciplines that are the focus of the mission of the non-service provider, nonprofit organization.

(b)

There is authorized to be appropriated such funds as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of the Child and Youth Investment Fund [established in the General Fund].

(c)

Beginning October 1, 2009, the Mayor shall submit a quarterly status report to the Council for all grants in excess of $1 million, which includes:

(1)

Detailed grantee data;

(2)

Performance measures and performance outcomes under each grant;

(3)

The specific services provided to children and youth under each grant;

(4)

The entity providing the services, if one other than the grantee;

(5)

The time period of delivery of the services;

(6)

The type of service provided;

(7)

The actual amount paid for the services; and

(8)

The amount of other expenditures under the grant, if any.

Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38, § 2403, 46 DCR 6408
Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 1402, 49 DCR 6968
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 5061(a), 57 DCR 181
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 5092, 57 DCR 6242
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 5082, 62 DCR 10905
D.C. Law 18-111, in subsec. (a), substituted “Subject to the requirements in subsections (a-1) and (a-2) of this section, the Mayor” for “The Mayor”; and added subsecs. (a-1), (a-2), and (c).
D.C. Law 18-223, in subsec. (a), substituted “nonprofit” for “non-profit”; and added subsecs. (a-1)(3) and (a-3).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 added (a-1)(4).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Service Improvement and Fiscal Year 2000 Budget Support Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-172, July 23, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 8266).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Service Improvement and Fiscal Year 2000 Budget Support Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-15, June 21, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 5459).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Service Improvement and Fiscal Year 2000 Budget Support Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-47, March 24, 2003, 50 DCR 2818).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Children and Youth Initiative Establishment Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-94, May 25, 2009, 56 DCR 4313).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5061(a) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5061(a) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5092 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5082 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Short title of title XIV of Law 14-190: Section 1401 of D.C. Law 14-190 provided that title XIV of the act may be cited as the Children and Youth Investment Fund Amendment Act of 2002.

Short title: Section 5060 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle G of title V of the act may be cited as the “Children and Youth Initiative Establishment Amendment Act of 2009”.

Short title: Section 5091 of D.C. Law 18-223 provided that subtitle J of title V of the act may be cited as the “Children and Youth Initiative Establishment Amendment Act of 2010”.

Delegation of Authority-Grant Making Authority to Child and Family Services Agency and Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services, see Mayor’s Order 2006-55, May 10, 2006 ( 53 DCR 5311).
Delegation of authority-Grant Making Authority to Department of Employment Services, see Mayor’s Order 2007-59, February 27, 2007.